Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1632.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 14, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-1971, to read: START_STATUTE41-1971. Credentialing applications; developmental disabilities services; deficiencies; denial; appeal; rules; definition A. if the department denies An application for CREDENTIALING or an APPLICATION for recredentialing, the department shall give the applicant an OPPORTUNITY to correct any DEFICIENCIES with the application that led to the INITIAL denial.  The applicant has fourteen business days after receiving the notice of DENIAL from the department to correct the DEFICIENCIES.  If the applicant notifies the department in writing within the fourteen-day period that the deficiencies have been corrected, the department shall reevaluate the credentialing or reCREDENTIALING application. B. If after reevaluation, the department denies the application and does not initiate a contract within fourteen business days, the applicant may appeal the decision pursuant to Article 3 of this chapter. C. on or before june 30, 2027, the department shall adopt rules to implement this section. d. for the purposes of this section, "CREDENTIALING" means the process of verifying the qualifications, standards and any other requirements a vendor must have to be ELIGIBLE to contract with the department to provide services pursuant to section 36-557. END_STATUTE